en: Eyewear Lens Cleaning Solutions
xx: Eyewear Lens Cleaning Solutions
cs: Čisticí roztoky na brýle
da: Brillerens
de: Kontaktlinsenreiniger
es: Soluciones de limpieza para lentes de gafas
fr: Nettoyants lunettes
it: Soluzioni per la pulizia delle lenti a contatto
ja: 眼鏡レンズ用洗浄剤
nl: Reinigers voor brillenglazen
no: Brillerens
pl: Płyny do czyszczenia okularów
pt: Soluções para limpeza de lentes
ru: Растворы для очистки линз очков
sv: Rengöringsvätskor för glasögon
tr: Gözlük Camı Temizleme Solüsyonları

en: Eyeglass lens cleaning wipes, Glasses cleaning wipes
da: Brillerenseservietter
nb: Brillerenseservietter
sv: Glasögonrengöringsservetter

en: Eyewear Replacement Parts
xx: Eyewear Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly k oční optice
da: Reservedele til briller
de: Brillenersatzteile
es: Piezas de repuesto para gafas
fr: Pièces de rechange pour lunettes
it: Parti di ricambio per occhiali
ja: 眼鏡交換部品
nl: Vervangende onderdelen voor brillen
no: Reservedeler til briller
pl: Części wymienne do artykułów okulistycznych
pt: Peças de reposição para óculos
ru: Запасные части для очков
sv: Reservdelar till glasögon
tr: Gözlük Yedek Parçaları

en: Eyewear Straps & Chains
xx: Eyewear Straps & Chains
cs: Řemínky a řetízky na brýle
da: Kæder og snore til briller
de: Brillenbänder & -ketten
es: Cintas y cadenas para gafas
fr: Chaînes et cordons à lunettes
it: Cordini e catenine per occhiali
ja: 眼鏡ストラップ・チェーン
nl: Brillenkoorden en -kettingen
no: Stropper og kjeder til briller
pl: Sznurki i łańcuszki do okularów
pt: Correntes e cordões para óculos
ru: Ремешки и цепочки для очков
sv: Snören och kedjor till glasögon
tr: Gözlük İpleri ve Zincirleri

en: Sunglass Lenses
xx: Sunglass Lenses
cs: Čočky do slunečních brýlí
da: Solbrilleglas
de: Sonnenbrillengläser
es: Lentes para gafas de sol
fr: Verres de lunettes de soleil
it: Lenti per occhiali da sole
ja: サングラス用レンズ
nl: Zonnebrilglazen
no: Solbrilleglass
pl: Szkła do okularów przeciwsłonecznych
pt: Lentes para óculos de sol
ru: Солнцезащитные линзы
sv: Solglasögonlinser
tr: Güneş Gözlüğü Camları

en: Shoes
da: Sko
sv: Skor

en: T-shirts
xx: T-shirts, Tshirts, teeshirts, teeshirt
fr: T-shirts, T-shirt

en: Women clothes
ar: ملابس نسائية
as: মহিলাৰ কাপোৰ
az: Qadın geyimləri
be: Жаночая вопратка
bg: Дамско облекло
bn: মহিলাদের পোশাক
cs: Dámské oblečení
da: Dametøj
de: Damenbekleidung
el: Γυναικεία ρούχα
es: Ropa de mujer
et: Naiste riided
fa: لباس زنانه
fi: Naisten vaatteet
fr: Vêtements pour femmes
ga: Éadaí na mban
gu: મહિલાઓના કપડાં
hi: महिलाओं के कपड़े
hr: Ženska odjeća
hu: Női ruházat
hy: Կանացի հագուստ
id: Pakaian wanita
is: Kvenfatnaður
it: Abbigliamento da donna
ja: レディース服
jw: Sandhangan wanita
ka: ქალის ტანსაცმელი
kk: Әйелдер киімі
km: សំលៀកបំពាក់នារី
kn: ಮಹಿಳೆಯರ ಉಡುಪು
ko: 여성 의류
ky: Аялдар кийими
lt: Moteriški drabužiai
lv: Sieviešu apģērbs
mk: Женска облека
ml: സ്ത്രീകളുടെ വസ്ത്രങ്ങൾ
mn: Эмэгтэйчүүдийн хувцас
mr: महिलांचे कपडे
ms: Pakaian wanita
mt: Ħwejjeġ tan-nisa
my: အမျိုးသမီးများ၏ အဝတ်အစား
ne: महिलाको लुगा
nl: Dameskleding
no: Dameklær
or: ମହିଳାମାନଙ୍କ ପୋଷାକ
pa: ਔਰਤਾਂ ਦੇ ਕੱਪੜੇ
pl: Odzież damska
ps: د ښځو کالي
pt: Roupa de mulher
ro: Haine pentru femei
ru: Женская одежда
sd: عورتن جا ڪپڙا
si: කාන්තා ඇඳුම්
sk: Dámske oblečenie
sl: Ženska oblačila
so: Dharka haweenka
sq: Rroba grash
sr: Женска одећа
sv: Damkläder
sw: Nguo za wanawake
ta: பெண்களுக்கான ஆடைகள்
te: మహిళల దుస్తులు
tg: Либоси занона
th: เสื้อผ้าผู้หญิง
tk: Aýal eşikleri
tl: Damit pambabae
tr: Kadın giyim
uk: Жіночий одяг
ur: خواتین کے کپڑے
uz: Ayollar kiyimi
vi: Quần áo phụ nữ
xh: Iimpahla zabasetyhini
yo: Aṣọ awọn obinrin
zh: 女装
zu: Izingubo zabesifazane

en: Men clothes
da: Herretøj
de: Herrenbekleidung
es: Ropa de hombre
fr: Vêtements pour hommes

en: Women shoes
da: Damesko
de: Damenschuhe
es: Zapatos de mujer
fr: Chaussures pour femmes

en: Men shoes
da: Herresko

en: Socks
da: Sokker
fr: Chaussettes, Chaussette

en: Pull-Over
fr: Pulls, Pull

en: Polyester T-shirt
fr: T-shirt en polyester

en: Cotton T-shirt
ar: تي شيرت قطني
as: কপাহী টি-চাৰ্ট
az: Pambıq köynək
be: Баваўняная футболка
bg: Памучна тениска
bn: কটন টি-শার্ট
cs: Bavlněné tričko
da: Bomulds T-shirt
de: Baumwoll-T-Shirt
el: Βαμβακερό μπλουζάκι
es: Camiseta de algodón
et: Puuvillane T-särk
fa: تی شرت نخی
fi: Puuvilla-T-paita
fr: T-shirt en coton
ga: T-léine cadáis
gu: કોટન ટી-શર્ટ
hi: सूती टी-शर्ट
hr: Pamučna majica
hu: Pamut póló
hy: Բամբակյա շապիկ
id: Kaos katun
is: Bómullarbolur
it: Maglietta di cotone
ja: 綿Tシャツ
jw: Kaos katun
ka: ბამბის მაისური
kk: Мақта футболка
km: អាវយឺតកប្បាស
kn: ಹತ್ತಿ ಟೀ ಶರ್ಟ್
ko: 면 티셔츠
ky: Пахта футболка
lt: Medvilniniai marškinėliai
lv: Kokvilnas T-krekls
mk: Памучна маица
ml: കോട്ടൺ ടി-ഷർട്ട്
mn: Хөвөн даавуун футболка
mr: सुती टी-शर्ट
ms: T-shirt kapas
mt: T-shirt tal-qoton
my: ဝါဂွမ်း တီရှပ်
ne: सुती टिसर्ट
nl: Katoenen T-shirt
no: Bomulls-T-skjorte
or: କଟନ୍ ଟି-ସାର୍ଟ
pa: ਸੂਤੀ ਟੀ-ਸ਼ਰਟ
pl: Bawełniana koszulka
ps: پنبې ټي شرټ
pt: Camiseta de algodão
ro: Tricou de bumbac
ru: Хлопковая футболка
sd: ڪپهه ٽي شرٽ
si: කපු ටී ෂර්ට්
sk: Bavlnené tričko
sl: Bombažna majica
so: Shaati suuf ah
sq: Bluza pambuku
sr: Памучна мајица
sv: Bomulls-T-shirt
sw: T-shati ya pamba
ta: பருத்தி டி-ஷர்ட்
te: కాటన్ టీ-షర్ట్
tg: Футболкаи пахтагӣ
th: เสื้อยืดผ้าฝ้าย
tk: Pagta köýnek
tl: T-shirt na koton
tr: Pamuklu tişört
uk: Бавовняна футболка
ur: سوتی ٹی شرٹ
uz: Paxta futbolka
vi: Áo thun cotton
xh: I-T-shirt yomqhaphu
yo: Ṣéèti owu
zh: 棉质T恤
zu: I-T-shirt kakotini

en: Polo shirt
da: Polo-skjorte, Poloskjorte
fr: Polo

en: Viscose shirt
fr: Chemise en viscose

en: Recycled cotton sweater
fr: Pull en coton recyclé

en: Wool sweater
fr: Pull en laine

en: Cotton shirt
fr: Chemise en coton